Maine, session 132, LD1323.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 7 MRSA c. 103, sub-c. 11-B is enacted to read:
SUBCHAPTER 11-B
NEONICOTINOID PESTICIDES
§1061. Definitions
As used in this subchapter, unless the context otherwise indicates, the following terms
have the following meanings.
1. Agricultural emergency. "Agricultural emergency" means an occurrence of any
pest that presents an imminent risk of significant harm or injury to or loss of agricultural
crops.
2. Bloom. "Bloom" means the period from the onset of flowering for a plant or the
process of flowering of a plant until petal fall is complete.
3. Crop group. "Crop group" means the groupings of agricultural commodities
specified in 40 Code of Federal Regulations, Section 180.41 (2023).
4. Environmental emergency. "Environmental emergency" means an occurrence of
any pest that presents a significant risk of harm or injury to the environment or significant
harm or injury to or loss of agricultural crops, including any exotic or foreign pest that may
need preventive quarantine measures to avert or prevent that risk, as determined by the
commissioner.
5. Neonicotinoid pesticide. "Neonicotinoid pesticide" means any pesticide containing
a chemical belonging to the neonicotinoid class of chemicals, including imidacloprid,
nithiazine, acetamiprid, clothianidin, dinotefuran, thiacloprid, thiamethoxam and any other
chemical designated by the commissioner by rule as belonging to the neonicotinoid class
of chemicals.
6. Neonicotinoid-treated seed. "Neonicotinoid-treated seed" means a treated seed
that is treated or coated with a neonicotinoid pesticide.
7. Ornamental plants. "Ornamental plants" means perennial, annual, biennial and
ground cover plants purposefully planted for aesthetic reasons.
§1062. Prohibited; application of neonicotinoid pesticides
1. Prohibited application. The following uses of neonicotinoid pesticides are
prohibited:
A. Outdoor application to any crop during bloom;
B. Outdoor application to soybeans or any crop in the cereal grains crop group;
C. Outdoor application of neonicotinoid pesticides to crops harvested after bloom in
the leafy vegetables; brassica; bulb vegetables; herbs and spices; and stalk, stem and
leaf petiole vegetable crop groups; and
D. Application to ornamental plants.
Page 1 - 132LR2167(01)

2. Exemptions. The commissioner, after consultation with the Commissioner of
Environmental Protection, may waive the requirements of this section and issue a written
exemption order if the commissioner determines that:
A. A valid environmental emergency or agricultural emergency exists;
B. The neonicotinoid pesticide would be effective in addressing the environmental
emergency or the agricultural emergency under paragraph A; and
C. A less harmful pesticide that is not a neonicotinoid pesticide or pest management
practice would not be as effective in addressing the environmental emergency or the
agricultural emergency under paragraph A.
3. Written exemption order contents. A written exemption order issued under
subsection 2:
A. May not be valid for a period of more than one year;
B. Must specify the neonicotinoid pesticides, uses and crops or plants to which the
exemption order applies; the date on which the exemption order takes effect; the
exemption order's duration; and the exemption order's geographic scope, which may
include specific farms, fields or properties; and
C. Must provide a detailed evaluation supporting a determination that an
environmental emergency or agricultural emergency exists.
4. Written exemption order restrictions. A written exemption order issued under
subsection 2 may establish restrictions on the use of neonicotinoid pesticides to which the
exemption order applies to minimize harm to pollinator populations, bird populations,
ecosystem health and public health or that the commissioner considers necessary.
5. Rescission. The commissioner, after consultation with the Commissioner of
Environmental Protection, may rescind a written exemption order issued under subsection
2 at any time. A rescission may not go into effect until at least 15 days after the issuance
of the written exemption order.
§1063. Prohibition on the use and sale of neonicotinoid-treated seeds
1. Prohibition. A person may not sell, offer for sale or use, distribute or use any
neonicotinoid-treated seed for soybeans or for any crop in the cereal grains crop group.
2. Exemptions. The commissioner, after consultation with the Commissioner of
Environmental Protection, may waive the requirements of this section and issue a written
exemption order only if:
A. The person seeking the exemption order:
(1) Completes integrated pest management training, provided by the commissioner
or an approved 3rd party;
(2) Completes a pest risk assessment and submits a pest risk assessment report to
the commissioner; and
(3) Maintains current records of the pest risk assessment report under subparagraph
(2) and records of when neonicotinoid-treated seeds are planted, both of which are
subject to review upon request by the commissioner; and
Page 2 - 132LR2167(01)

B. Any neonicotinoid-treated seeds authorized for use under the exemption order are
planted only on the property or properties identified in the pest risk assessment report
under paragraph A, subparagraph (2).
3. Written exemption order contents. A written exemption order issued under
subsection 2:
A. May not be valid for a period of more than one year; and
B. Must specify the types of neonicotinoid-treated seeds to which the exemption order
applies, the date on which the exemption order takes effect and the exemption order's
duration.
4. Written exemption order restrictions. A written exemption order issued under
subsection 2 may establish restrictions to the use of neonicotinoid-treated seeds to which
the exemption order applies to minimize harm to pollinator populations, bird populations,
ecosystem health and public health or that the commissioner considers necessary.
5. Rescission. The commissioner, after consultation with the Commissioner of
Environmental Protection, may rescind a written exemption order issued under subsection
2 at any time. A rescission may not go into effect until at least 30 days after the issuance
of the written exemption order and may not apply to neonicotinoid-treated seeds planted or
sown prior to the effective date of the rescission.
§1064. Report
Upon issuing a written exemption order under section 1062 or 1063, the commissioner
shall submit a copy of the exemption order to the joint standing committee of the
Legislature having jurisdiction over agriculture, conservation and forestry matters.
§1065. Rulemaking
The department may adopt rules as necessary for the purposes of implementing and
enforcing this subchapter. Rules adopted pursuant to this section are routine technical rules
as defined in Title 5, chapter 375, subchapter 2-A.
Sec. 2. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 1, 2026.